Washington statutes.
RCW 11.130.315

Notice of order of appointment—Rights.

Not later than 14 days after appointment of a guardian under RCW 11.130.305, the guardian shall give to the adult subject to guardianship and any other person entitled to notice under RCW 11.130.310 (5) or (6) or a subsequent order a copy of the order of appointment and a statement of the rights of the adult subject to guardianship and procedures to seek relief if the adult is denied those rights. The statement must be in at least sixteen-point font, in plain language, and, to the extent feasible, in a language in which the adult subject to guardianship is proficient. The statement must notify the adult subject to guardianship of the right to:

(1) Seek termination or modification of the guardianship, or removal of the guardian, and choose an attorney to represent the adult in these matters;

(2) Be involved in decisions affecting the adult, including decisions about the adult's care, dwelling, activities, or social interactions, to the extent reasonably feasible;

(3) Be involved in health care decision making to the extent reasonably feasible and supported in understanding the risks and benefits of health care options to the extent reasonably feasible;

(4) Be notified at least fourteen days before a change in the adult's primary dwelling or permanent move to a nursing home, mental health facility, or other facility that places restrictions on the individual's ability to leave or have visitors unless the change or move is proposed in the guardian's plan under RCW 11.130.340 or authorized by the court by specific order;

(5) Object to a change or move described in subsection (4) of this section and the process for objecting;

(6) Communicate, visit, or interact with others, including receiving visitors, and making or receiving telephone calls, personal mail, or electronic communications, including through social media, unless:

(a) The guardian has been authorized by the court by specific order to restrict communications, visits, or interactions;

(b) A protective order or protective arrangement instead of guardianship is in effect that limits contact between the adult and a person; or

(c) The guardian has good cause to believe restriction is necessary because interaction with a specified person poses a risk of significant physical, psychological, or financial harm to the adult, and the restriction is:

(i) For a period of not more than seven business days if the person has a relative or preexisting social relationship with the adult; or

(ii) For a period of not more than sixty days if the person does not have a relative or preexisting social relationship with the adult;

(7) Receive a copy of the guardian's plan under RCW 11.130.340 and the guardian's report under RCW 11.130.345;

(8) Object to the guardian's plan or report; and

(9) Associate with persons of their choosing as provided in RCW 11.130.335(5).

[ 2024 c 267 s 5; 2019 c 437 s 311.]